Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.802

Task force on first responder wellness. (Expires December 31, 2028.)

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the commission shall convene a task force on first responder wellness in Washington state. To the extent possible, the membership of the task force should include representatives that reflect the diversity of the first responder professions, including diversity in geography, gender, sexuality, and race.

(2) The first responder wellness task force shall be cochaired by the executive director of the commission, or the executive director's designee, and a representative of the fire service, and consist of the following additional membership:

(a) Two members from each of the following professions:

(i) Emergency medical services frontline providers;

(ii) Emergency dispatchers; and

(iii) Jail corrections officers;

(b) One member from each of the following entities:

(i) The Washington council of police and sheriffs;

(ii) The Washington state fraternal order of police;

(iii) The Washington state patrol troopers association;

(iv) The Washington state patrol lieutenants and captains association;

(v) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(vi) The Washington state council of firefighters;

(vii) The Washington fire chiefs association;

(viii) The Washington state firefighters' association;

(ix) The department of labor and industries;

(x) The state board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers;

(xi) The state chapter of the association of public safety communications officials;

(xii) The state chapter of the national emergency number association; and

(xiii) International brotherhood of teamsters local 117;

(c) Two members representing the interests of tribal law enforcement officers and agencies;

(d) Two members representing the interests of tribal first responders;

(e) Two members from the Washington association of coroners and medical examiners;

(f) One member from the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences, who has implemented a regional state-funded law enforcement officer wellness program;

(g) One member from the Washington federation of state employees, representing the interests of the department of corrections' community corrections officers;

(h) The chief of the Washington state patrol, or the chief's designee;

(i) The secretary of the department of corrections, or the secretary's designee; and

(j) Any other members that the commission determines should participate in the task force to represent the interests of first responders.

(3) The commission shall convene the initial meeting of the task force no later than December 1, 2024.

(4) At a minimum, the task force shall meet quarterly.

(5) The task force shall:

(a) Monitor the implementation of chapter 295, Laws of 2024;

(b) Evaluate the findings and recommendations of the task force on law enforcement officer mental health and wellness in Washington state as established under chapter 327, Laws of 2020 (SSB 6570), and determine ways in which the task force on first responder wellness may continue developing upon the recommendations of the task force on law enforcement officer mental health and wellness; and

(c) Make recommendations to improve first responder wellness across the first responder professions in the state.

(6)(a) The task force shall also develop and publish model policies for first responder peer support services tailored to the following first responder professions:

(i) Law enforcement officers;

(ii) Firefighters;

(iii) Emergency medical services frontline providers;

(iv) Emergency dispatchers;

(v) Corrections officers; and

(vi) Coroners and medical examiners.

(b) The task force must design the model policies to support efforts to establish and expand peer support services opportunities and networks for the professions specified under (a) of this subsection, and to develop best practices and resources for peer supporters from those professions.

(c) In developing the model policies, the task force must obtain the services of an organization with expertise in peer emotional support and peer workforce development to provide technical assistance.

(d) The task force must publish the model policies by December 31, 2025.

(7) Beginning December 1, 2025, the task force shall submit an annual report to the legislature on the status of its work.

(8) This section expires December 31, 2028.

[ 2024 c 295 s 1.]